Washington statutes.
RCW 44.90.110

Activities exempt from certain ethics in public service provisions.

(1) The following activities conducted by or on behalf of legislative employees related to collective bargaining under this chapter are exempt from the restrictions contained in RCW 42.52.020 and 42.52.160:

(a) Using paid time and public resources by an employee to negotiate or administer a collective bargaining agreement under this chapter when the employee is assigned to negotiate or administer the collective bargaining agreement and the use of paid time and public resources does not include state purchased supplies or equipment, does not interfere with or distract from the conduct of state business, and is consistent with the employer's policy on the use of paid time;

(b) Lobbying conducted by an employee organization, lobbyist, association, or third party on behalf of legislative employees concerning legislation that directly impacts legislative workplace conditions;

(c) Communication with a prospective employee organization during nonwork hours and without the use of public resources; or

(d) Conducting the day-to-day work of organizing and representing legislative employees in the workplace while serving in a legislative employee organization leadership position.

(2)(a) Nothing in this section affects the application of the prohibition against the use of special privileges under RCW 42.52.070, confidentiality requirements under RCW 42.52.050, or other applicable provisions of chapter 42.52 RCW to legislative employees.

(b) Nothing in this section permits any direct lobbying by a legislative employee.

(3) As used in this section, "lobby" and "lobbyist" have the meanings provided in *RCW 42.17A.005.

[ 2024 c 333 s 19.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 42.17A.005 was repealed by 2024 c 164 s 257, effective January 1, 2026. For later enactment, see RCW 29B.10.350 and 29B.10.360.

Effective date—2024 c 333: See note following RCW 44.90.025.